Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.220.035

Traffic safety education program—Required curriculum—Development by the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the department of licensing.

The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the department of licensing shall jointly develop and maintain a required curriculum for school districts and approved private schools operating a traffic safety education program. The jointly developed curriculum must be prepared by August 1, 2018. The curriculum and instructional materials must comply with the course content requirements of RCW 46.82.420(2) and 46.82.430. In developing the curriculum, the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the department of licensing shall consult with one or more of Central Washington University's traffic safety education instructors or program content developers.

[ 2017 c 197 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2017 c 197: See notes following RCW 28A.220.020.